Illinois, session 104th, SB1481.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Park District Code is amended by changing 5Sections 2-10a, 2-12a, and 2-25 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 1205/2-10a)  (from Ch. 105, par. 2-10a)7    Sec. 2-10a. Any district may provide by referendum, or by 8resolution of the board, that the board shall be comprised of 7 9commissioners. Any such referendum shall be initiated and held 10in the same manner as is provided by the general election law.11    If a majority of the votes cast on the proposition is in 12favor of the 7-member board, or if the board adopts a 13resolution stating that it is acting pursuant to this Section 14in order to create a 7-member board, then whichever of the 15following transition schedules are appropriate shall be 16applied: At the election of commissioners next following by at 17least 225 197 days after the date on which the proposition to 18create a 7-member board was approved at referendum or by 19resolution, the number of commissioners to be elected shall be 202 more than the number that would otherwise have been elected. 21If this results in the election, pursuant to Section 2-12 of 22this Act, of 4 commissioners at that election, one of the 4, to 23be determined by lot within 30 days after the election, shall   SB1481- 2 -LRB104 06128 RTM 16161 b1serve for a term of 4 years or 2 years as the case may be, 2instead of 6 years, so that his term will expire in the same 3year in which the term of only one of the incumbent 4commissioners expires. Thereafter, all commissioners shall be 5elected for 6-year terms as provided in Section 2-12. If the 6creation of a 7-member board results in the election of either 73 or 4 commissioners, pursuant to Section 2-12a of this Act, at 8that election, 2 of them, to be determined by lot within 30 9days after the election, shall serve for terms of 2 years 10instead of 4 years. Thereafter, all commissioners shall be 11elected for 4-year terms as provided in Section 2-12a of this 12Act.13    In any district where a 7-member board has been created 14pursuant to this Section whether by referendum or by 15resolution, the number of commissioners may later be reduced 16to 5, but only by a referendum initiated and held in the same 17manner as prescribed in this Section for creating a 7-member 18board. No proposition to reduce the number of commissioners 19shall affect the terms of any commissioners holding office at 20the time of the referendum or to be elected within 225 197 days 21after the referendum. If a majority of the votes cast on the 22proposition is in favor of reducing a 7-member board to a 235-member board, then, at the election of commissioners next 24following by at least 225 197 days after the date on which the 25proposition was approved at referendum, the number of 26commissioners to be elected shall be 2 less than the number   SB1481- 3 -LRB104 06128 RTM 16161 b1that would otherwise have been elected and whichever of the 2following transition schedules are appropriate shall be 3applied: (i) if this results in the election of no 4commissioners for a 6-year term pursuant to Section 2-12 of 5this Act, then at the next election in which 3 commissioners 6are scheduled to be elected to 6-year terms as provided in 7Section 2-12, one of the 3, to be determined by lot within 30 8days after the election, shall serve for a term of 4 years or 2 9years, as the case may be, instead of 6 years, so that his or 10her term will expire in the same year in which the term of no 11incumbent commissioner is scheduled to expire; thereafter, all 12commissioners shall be elected for 6-year terms as provided in 13Section 2-12; or (ii) if the reduction to a 5-member board 14results in the election of one commissioner to a 4-year term, 15pursuant to Section 2-12a of this Act, then at the next 16election in which 4 commissioners are scheduled to be elected 17to 4-year terms as provided in Section 2-12a, one of the 4, to 18be determined by lot within 30 days after the election, shall 19serve for a term of 2 years, instead of 4 years, so that his or 20her term will expire in the same year in which the term of only 21one incumbent commissioner is scheduled to expire; thereafter, 22all commissioners shall be elected for 4-year terms as 23provided in Section 2-12a. 24(Source: P.A. 103-467, eff. 8-4-23.) 25    (70 ILCS 1205/2-12a)  (from Ch. 105, par. 2-12a)  SB1481- 4 -LRB104 06128 RTM 16161 b1    Sec. 2-12a. Any district may provide, either by resolution 2of the board or by referendum, that the term of commissioners 3shall be 4 years rather than 6 years. Any such referendum shall 4be initiated and held in the same manner as is provided by the 5general election law for public questions authorized by 6Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.7    If a majority of the votes cast on the proposition is in 8favor of a 4-year term for commissioners, or if the Board 9adopts a resolution stating that it is acting pursuant to this 10Section to change the term of office from 6 years to 4 years, 11commissioners thereafter elected, commencing with the first 12regular park district election at least 225 197 days after the 13date on which the proposition for 4-year terms was approved at 14referendum or by resolution, shall be elected for a term of 4 15years. In order to provide for the transition from 6-year 16terms to 4-year terms:17        (1) If 2 commissioners on a 5-member board are to be 18    elected at the first such election and if the term of only 19    one commissioner is scheduled to expire in the year of the 20    next election at which commissioners are elected, of the 2 21    commissioners elected, one shall serve a 2-year term and 22    one a 4-year term, to be determined by lot between the 2 23    persons elected within 30 days after the election.24        (2) On a 7-member board under Section 2-10a, if the 25    terms of only 2 commissioners are scheduled to expire in 26    the year of the second election at which commissioners are   SB1481- 5 -LRB104 06128 RTM 16161 b1    elected after the first regular park district election at 2    least 225 197 days after the date on which the proposition 3    for 4-year terms was approved at referendum or by 4    resolution, then:5            (A) if 3 commissioners are elected at the first 6        regular election, 2 of the commissioners elected shall 7        serve a 2-year term and one shall serve a 4-year term 8        to be determined by lot between persons elected within 9        30 days after the first election; or10            (B) if 2 commissioners are elected at the first 11        regular election, those 2 commissioners elected shall 12        serve a 2-year term. 13    In any district where the board has created 4-year terms 14pursuant to this Section, whether by referendum or by 15resolution, the length of terms may later be increased to 6 16years, but only by a referendum initiated and held in the same 17manner as prescribed in this Section for creating 4-year 18terms. No proposition to increase the terms of commissioners 19shall affect any commissioner holding office at the time of 20the referendum or to be elected within 225 197 days after the 21referendum.22(Source: P.A. 103-467, eff. 8-4-23.) 23    (70 ILCS 1205/2-25)  (from Ch. 105, par. 2-25)24    Sec. 2-25. Vacancies. Whenever any member of the governing 25board of any park district (i) dies, (ii) resigns, (iii)   SB1481- 6 -LRB104 06128 RTM 16161 b1becomes under legal disability, (iv) ceases to be a legal 2voter in the district, (v) is convicted in any court located in 3the United States of any infamous crime, bribery, perjury, or 4other felony, (vi) refuses or neglects to take his or her oath 5of office, (vii) neglects to perform the duties of his or her 6office or attend meetings of the board for the length of time 7as the board fixes by ordinance, or (viii) for any other reason 8specified by law, that office may be declared vacant. 9Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by a majority of the 10remaining members of the board. Any person so appointed shall 11hold his or her office until the next regular election for this 12office, at which a member shall be elected to fill the vacancy 13for the unexpired term, subject to the following conditions:14        (1) If the vacancy occurs with less than 28 months 15    remaining in the term, the person appointed to fill the 16    vacancy shall hold his or her office until the expiration 17    of the term for which he or she has been appointed, and no 18    election to fill the vacancy shall be held.19        (2) If the vacancy occurs with more than 28 months 20    left in the term, but less than 151 123 days before the 21    next regularly scheduled election for this office, the 22    person appointed to fill the vacancy shall hold his or her 23    office until the second regularly scheduled election for 24    the office following the appointment, at which a member 25    shall be elected to fill the vacancy for the unexpired 26    term.  SB1481- 7 -LRB104 06128 RTM 16161 b1(Source: P.A. 101-257, eff. 8-9-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.